Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,199
Receivership or custodianship.

(MBCA 14.32) (a) Unless an
election to purchase has been filed under section 21-2,201, a court in a judicial
proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers
to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the business
and affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying
all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the
court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver
or custodian has jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property
wherever located.

(b) The court may appoint
an individual or a domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to transact
business in this state, as a receiver or custodian. The court may require
the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount
the court directs.

(c)
The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian
in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other
powers:

(1)
The receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation
wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court,
and (ii) may sue and defend in his or her own name as receiver of the corporation
in all courts of this state; and

(2) The custodian may exercise all of the powers of
the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors, to the extent
necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of
its shareholders and creditors.

(d) The court during a receivership may redesignate
the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian
a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation, its shareholders,
and creditors.

(e)
The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order
compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian
from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 199.
January 1, 2016